Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1648
Jury commissioner; deputy; appointment; powers.

(1) The jury commissioner shall appoint a deputy jury commissioner from the regular employees of his or her office who shall serve ex officio and who shall hold office during the pleasure of the jury commissioner. The deputy jury commissioner shall be approved by the judge or judges of the district court before taking office. The deputy jury commissioner, during the absence of the jury commissioner from the county or during the sickness or disability of the jury commissioner, with the consent of such judge or judges, may perform any or all of the duties of the jury commissioner.

(2) If there are no regular employees of the office of jury commissioner, he or she may appoint some other county officer or employee thereof as deputy jury commissioner.

Laws 1915, c. 248, § 1, p. 568;

C.S.1922, § 9096;

C.S.1929, § 20-1626;

R.S.1943, § 25-1626;

Laws 1951, c. 69, § 1, p. 224;

Laws 1953, c. 72, § 7, p. 227;

Laws 1955, c. 90, § 2, p. 265;

Laws 1955, c. 91, § 1, p. 268;

Laws 1965, c. 123, § 1, p. 460;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1626;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 5;

Laws 2022, LB922, § 3.